Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 1. Organization.

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 7 AAC 80.

Sec. 44.29.010.
Commissioner of health and social services.

The principal executive officer of the Department of Health and Social Services is the commissioner of health and social services.

History.

(§ 12 ch 64 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 104 SLA 1971)

Collateral references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d, Health, §§ 17-30

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Funds, §§ 59, 64.

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, § 1 et seq.

Sec. 44.29.020.
Duties of department.

The Department of Health and Social Services shall administer the state programs of public health and social services, including

maternal and child health services;

preventive medical services;

public health nursing services;

nutrition services;

health education;

laboratories;

mental health treatment and diagnosis;

management of state institutions, except for adult penal institutions;

medical facilities;

adult public assistance;

the Alaska temporary assistance program;

child welfare services;

general relief;

a comprehensive smoking education, tobacco use prevention, and tobacco control program; to the maximum extent possible, the department shall administer the program required under this paragraph by grant to or contract with one or more organizations in the state; the department’s program must include

a community-based tobacco use prevention and cessation component addressing the needs of youth and adults that includes use of cessation aids such as a nicotine patch or a nicotine gum tobacco substitute;

youth-based efforts that involve youth in the design and implementation of tobacco control efforts;

anti-tobacco counter-marketing targeting both youth and adult populations designed to communicate messages to help prevent youth initiation of tobacco use, promote cessation among tobacco users, and educate the public about the lethal effects of exposure to secondhand smoke;

tobacco use surveys of youth and adult populations concerning knowledge, awareness, attitude, and use of tobacco products; and

an enforcement component;

the Alaska Pioneers’ Home and the Alaska Veterans’ Home;

licensure and regulation of child care facilities;

a comprehensive marijuana use education and treatment program; to the extent possible, the department shall administer the program required under this paragraph by grant to or contract with one or more organizations in the state; the department’s program must include

a community-based marijuana misuse prevention component; the community-based component must provide for a youth services grant program to

reduce initiation and promote cessation of marijuana use by youth, reduce youth access to marijuana products, and reduce exposure of youth to impaired driving dangers related to marijuana use;

provide recreational, educational, and character-building programs for youth outside school hours; and

address marijuana use prevention through outcome-based curricula, adult and peer mentoring, and opportunities for positive, prosocial leisure and recreational activities;

marijuana public education designed to communicate messages to help prevent youth initiation of marijuana use, educate the public about the effects of marijuana use, and educate the public about marijuana laws;

surveys of

youth and adult populations concerning knowledge, awareness, attitude, and use of marijuana products;

the need for trained professionals working in organizations described in this paragraph;

the development of plans to address the need for trained professionals and to assist in implementing a training program for those professionals;

monitoring of population health status related to the consequences of marijuana use; and

substance abuse screening, brief intervention, and referral to treatment.

The Department of Health and Social Services shall comply with AS

15.07.055

to serve as a voter registration agency to the extent required by state and federal law, including 42 U.S.C. 1973gg (National Voter Registration Act of 1993).

The Department of Health and Social Services shall cooperate with the Department of Public Safety in enforcement of the prohibition on the possession, offer, display, marketing, advertising, or sale of illicit synthetic drugs under AS 17.21.

History.

(§ 12 ch 64 SLA 1959; am § 3 ch 104 SLA 1971; am § 47 ch 71 SLA 1972; am E.O. No. 51, § 41 (1981); am § 98 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 7 ch 138 SLA 1982; am E.O. No. 55, §§ 39, 40 (1984); am § 16 ch 111 SLA 1994; am § 27 ch 107 SLA 1996; am § 85 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 3 ch 87 SLA 2000; am E.O. No. 108, § 4 (2003); am §§ 11, 25 ch 59 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 86 SLA 2014; am § 10 ch 73 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, the paragraphs in (a) of this section were renumbered to reflect the repeal of former paragraph (a)(14).

In 2014, the paragraphs in this section were renumbered to reflect the repeal of former paragraph (a)(16).

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and purpose in connection with the enactment of former AS

44.21.035

, on which this section is based, see § 1, ch. 98, SLA 1992 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For purpose, applicability, and administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 10, art. 1.

For environmental health and safety, see 7 AAC 10, art. 4.

For inspections and investigations, see 7 AAC 10, art. 6.

For physical examination of school children, see 7 AAC 27, art. 5.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 50, art. 1.

For administration, see 7 AAC 50, art. 2.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 50, art. 3.

For admission and discharge, see 7 AAC 50, art. 4.

For care and services, see 7 AAC 50, art. 5.

For environment, see 7 AAC 50, art. 6.

For specializations, see 7 AAC 50, art. 7.

For maternity homes, see 7 AAC 50, art. 8.

For residential psychiatric treatment centers, see 7 AAC 50, art. 9.

For child foster care payments, see 7 AAC 53, art. 1.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 56, art. 1.

For administration, see 7 AAC 56, art. 2.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 56, art. 3.

For services related to the decision to place a child, see 7 AAC 56, art. 4.

For services related to placement and supervision of a placement, see 7 AAC 56, art. 5.

For foster and residential care placement and foster home evaluation, see 7 AAC 56, art. 6.

For adoptive and guardianship placement and home study, see 7 AAC 56, art. 7.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 57, art. 1.

For administration, see 7 AAC 57, art. 2.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 57, art. 3.

For admission, see 7 AAC 57, art. 4.

For care and services, see 7 AAC 57, art. 5.

For environment, see 7 AAC 57, art. 6.

For specializations, see 7 AAC 57, art. 7.

For grant programs, see 7 AAC 78.

For public health services, see 7 AAC 80, art. 1.

For family and youth services, see 7 AAC 80, art. 2.

For alcohol safety action program services, see 7 AAC 80, art. 3.

For grant services for individuals, see 7 AAC 81.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective October 14, 2014, added (c).

The 2018 amendment, effective October 28, 2018, added (a)(17), and made related and stylistic changes.

Sec. 44.29.022.
Fees for department services.

The commissioner of health and social services may establish by regulation a schedule of reasonable fees for services provided by the Department of Health and Social Services under AS

44.29.020(a)(1)

— (8) and (14), AS 47.10, AS 47.12, AS 47.14, AS

47.30.655

—

47.30.910

, and AS

47.80.100

—

47.80.170

and for the administration of public health programs under AS 18. The fee established for a service may not exceed the actual cost of providing the service. The commissioner may define or establish the “actual cost of providing a service” by regulation. The Department of Health and Social Services shall charge and collect the fees established under this subsection. The department may waive collection of a fee upon a finding that collection is not economically feasible or in the public interest.

The commissioner of health and social services may establish by regulation and the department may charge reasonable fees for department publications and research data to cover the cost of reproduction, printing, mailing, and distribution.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

A regulation that establishes a fee for services under AS

44.29.020(a)(7)

that are part of the integrated comprehensive mental health program under AS 47.30 may be adopted under this section after consultation with the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority.

The commissioner of health and social services shall consult with stakeholders regarding the reasonableness of fees when developing a schedule of reasonable fees under (a) of this section for services under AS

44.29.020(a)(14)

or programs under AS 18 for which there is no regulation in effect establishing a schedule of reasonable fees. The consultation must include at least one public meeting and must occur before the commissioner provides notice of proposed action under AS

44.62.190

. The commissioner shall provide notice of the public meeting at least 30 days before the meeting in the same manner as required under AS

44.62.190(a)

for a notice of proposed action.

History.

(§ 69 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 16 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991; am § 11 ch 59 SLA 1996; am §§ 2, 3 ch 68 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 7 AAC 80.

For public health services, see 7 AAC 80, art. 1.

For family and youth services, see 7 AAC 80, art. 2.

For alcohol safety action program services, see 7 AAC 80, art. 3.

The 2018 amendment, effective October 22, 2019, in (a), substituted “AS

44.29.020(a)(1)

– (8) and (14)” for “AS

44.29.020(a)(1)

– (8)” following “Social Services under”, and added “and for the administration of public health programs under AS 18” at the end of the first sentence; added (e).

Sec. 44.29.024.
Fees for services of contractors or grantees.

The commissioner of health and social services may establish by regulation a schedule of reasonable fees for services provided by a contractor or grantee of the Department of Health and Social Services under AS 18 or AS 47. The fee established for a service may not exceed the actual cost of providing the service. The commissioner may define or establish the “actual cost of providing a service” by regulation.

The Department of Health and Social Services may require the recipient of a grant or a contractor under a grant to charge the fees established under (a) of this section for services provided by the recipient or contractor and to use the fees collected for the program providing the services.

A regulation that establishes a schedule of reasonable fees for services provided by a contractor or grantee that are part of the integrated comprehensive mental health program established under AS 47.30 may be adopted under this section after consultation with the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority.

History.

(§ 69 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 17 ch 66 SLA 1991)

Administrative Code. —

For public health services, see 7 AAC 80, art. 1.

For family and youth services, see 7 AAC 80, art. 2.

For alcohol safety action program services, see 7 AAC 80, art. 3.

Sec. 44.29.027.
Dental radiological equipment.

This chapter does not authorize the department to register, inspect, test, or otherwise regulate dental radiological equipment or records relating to dental radiological equipment regulated by the Board of Dental Examiners under AS

08.36.075

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 79 SLA 1998)

Secs. 44.29.030 — 44.29.090.
Advisory Board on Alcoholism. [Repealed, § 2 ch 207 SLA 1972.]